Utah statutes.
75-5-208.   Consent to service by acceptance of appointment -- Notice.
By accepting a testamentary, instrumental, or court appointment as guardian, a
guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding
relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person
or any person interested in the welfare of the minor.  Notice of any
proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian or mailed to him by ordinary
mail at his address as listed in the court records and to his address as then
known to the petitioner.  Letters of guardianship shall indicate whether the
guardian was appointed by will, written instrument, or by court order.
